Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.121

Voting and classes of membership.

(1) Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, the affirmative vote, approval, or consent of a majority of the members is necessary for actions requiring member approval.

(2) The affirmative vote, approval, or consent of all members is required to:

(a) Amend the certificate of formation, except as provided in RCW 25.15.076(2);

(b) Amend the limited liability company agreement;

(c) Authorize a manager, member, or other person to do any act on behalf of the limited liability company that contravenes the limited liability company agreement, including any provision that expressly limits the purpose, business, or affairs of the limited liability company or the conduct thereof;

(d) Admit as a member of the limited liability company a person acquiring a limited liability company interest directly from the limited liability company as provided in RCW 25.15.116(2)(a);

(e) Admit as a member of the limited liability company a transferee of a limited liability company interest as provided in RCW 25.15.116(2)(b);

(f) Authorize a member's removal as a member of the limited liability company as provided in RCW 25.15.131(1)(e);

(g) Waive a member's dissociation as a member of the limited liability company as provided in RCW 25.15.131(1) (f), (g), or (h);

(h) Compromise any member's obligation to make a contribution or return cash or other property paid or distributed to the member in violation of this chapter as provided in RCW 25.15.196(2);

(i) Amend the certificate of formation and extend the date of dissolution, if a dissolution date is specified in the certificate of formation, as provided in RCW 25.15.265(1);

(j) Dissolve the limited liability company as provided in RCW 25.15.265(3);

(k) Approve a plan of conversion as provided in RCW 25.15.441(1);

(l) Sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of all, or substantially all, of the limited liability company's property, other than in the ordinary course of the limited liability company's activities or activities of the kind carried on by the limited liability company; or

(m) Undertake any other act outside the ordinary course of the limited liability company's activities.

(3) A limited liability company agreement may provide for classes or groups of members having such relative rights, powers, and duties as the limited liability company agreement may provide, and may make provision for the future creation in the manner provided in the limited liability company agreement of additional classes or groups of members having such relative rights, powers, and duties as may from time to time be established, including rights, powers, and duties senior to existing classes and groups of members. A limited liability company agreement may provide for the taking of an action, including the amendment of the limited liability company agreement, without the vote or approval of any member or class or group of members, including an action to create under the provisions of the limited liability company agreement a class or group of limited liability company interests that was not previously outstanding. A limited liability company agreement may provide that any member or class or group of members do not have voting rights.

(4) A limited liability company agreement may grant to all or certain identified members or a specified class or group of the members the right to vote separately or with all or any class or group of the members or managers, on any matter. If the limited liability company agreement so provides, voting by members may be on a per capita, profit share, class, group, or any other basis.

(5) A limited liability company agreement may set forth provisions relating to notice of the time, place, or purpose of any meeting at which any matter is to be voted on by any members, waiver of any such notice, action by consent without a meeting, the establishment of a record date, quorum requirements, voting in person or by proxy, or any other matter with respect to the exercise of any such right to vote.

[ 2022 c 42 s 304; 2015 c 188 s 26.]